Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-381
Amendment or expungement of records; good cause; notice.

At any time, the department may amend, expunge, or remove from the registry any record upon good cause. Upon request, written notice of any amendment, expunction, or removal of any record made pursuant to the Adult Protective Services Act shall be served upon the vulnerable adult who is the subject of the report or the person who allegedly abused the vulnerable adult. The department shall advise any other individuals or agencies who received a copy of the record pursuant to the Adult Protective Services Act to amend, expunge, or destroy such record. All information identifying the subjects of unsubstantiated reports shall be expunged from the registry.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 34.